Tennessee, session 114, SB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-5-712, is amended by deleting
"on January 31, 1998, and annually thereafter" and substituting "on or before January 31 of
each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1331
003116
- 1 -